Vermont, session 2025-2026, H432.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 4088f is amended to read:
§ 4088f. PROSTHETIC PARITY COVERAGE FOR PROSTHETIC AND
ORTHOTIC DEVICES
(a) As used in this section:
VT LEG #380733 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.432
2025 Page 2 of 7
(1) “Health insurance plan” means any health insurance policy or health
benefit plan offered by a health insurer, as defined in 18 V.S.A. § 9402, as well
as Medicaid and any other public health care assistance program offered or
administered by the State or by any subdivision or instrumentality of the State.
The term shall not include policies or plans providing coverage for a specific
disease or other limited benefit coverage.
(2) “Prosthetic device and orthotic devices” means an artificial limb
device to replace, in whole or in part, an arm or a leg, arm, back, and neck
braces and artificial legs, arms, and eyes, whether standard or custom-made.
(b) A health insurance plan shall provide coverage for prosthetic and
orthotic devices in all health plans that is at least equivalent to that the
coverage provided by the federal Medicare program pursuant to 42 U.S.C.
§§ 1395k, 1395l, and 1395m and 42 C.F.R. §§ 414.202, 414.210, 414.228, and
140.100. Coverage may be limited to the shall be provided for all of the
following:
(1) a prosthetic or orthotic device that is determined by the covered
individual’s treating health care provider to be the most appropriate model that
is medically necessary to meet the patient’s adequately meets the covered
individual’s medical needs;
(2) a prosthetic or orthotic device that is determined by the covered
individual’s treating health care provider to be the most appropriate model that
VT LEG #380733 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.432
2025 Page 3 of 7
meets the covered individual’s medical needs for purposes of performing
physical activities, such as running, biking, swimming, and strength training,
as applicable, and that maximizes the covered individual’s whole-body health
and the functions of the individual’s lower or upper limbs, or both;
(3) a prosthetic or orthotic device that is determined by the covered
individual’s treating health care provider to be the most appropriate model that
meets the covered individual’s medical needs for purposes of showering or
bathing;
(4) all materials and components necessary for the covered individual’s
use of the prostheses and orthoses described in subdivisions (1)–(3) of this
subsection;
(5) instruction to the covered individual on using the device or devices,
materials, and components described in subdivisions (1)–(4) of this subsection;
and
(6) the medically necessary repair or replacement of a prosthetic or
orthotic device, material, or component described in subdivisions (1)–(4) of
this subsection, as further described in subsection (f) of this section.
(c)(1) A health insurance plan shall consider coverage for prosthetic and
orthotic devices to be habilitative or rehabilitative benefits for purposes of any
federal or State requirement regarding coverage of essential health benefits.
VT LEG #380733 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.432
2025 Page 4 of 7
(2) For purposes of the coverage required by subdivisions (b)(2) and (3)
of this section, a health plan may require the covered individual’s treating
health care provider to determine that the additional prosthetic or orthotic
device is necessary to enable the person to engage in physical activities, such
as running, biking, swimming, strength training, showering, and bathing, as
applicable, and to maximize the covered individual’s whole-body health and
the functions of the individual’s lower or upper limbs, or both.
(3) A health plan shall make its utilization review determinations in a
nondiscriminatory manner and shall not deny coverage for a prosthetic or
orthotic device solely on the basis of a covered individual’s actual or perceived
disability.
(4) A health insurance plan shall not deny coverage for a prosthetic or
orthotic device for a physical activity for a covered individual with limb loss or
absence if the plan would provide coverage for an individual without a
disability who was seeking a medical or surgical intervention to restore or
maintain the individual’s ability to perform the same physical activity.
(5) A health insurance plan shall include language describing a covered
individual’s rights pursuant to subdivisions (3) and (4) of this subsection in the
plan’s evidence of coverage and in any benefit denial letters.
(6) Any dispute between the insured and the carrier a covered individual
and a health insurance plan concerning coverage and the application of this
VT LEG #380733 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.432
2025 Page 5 of 7
section shall be subject to independent external review under section 4089f of
this title.
(c)(d) A health insurance plan may require prior authorization for
prosthetic devices in the same manner and to the same extent as prior
authorization is required for any other covered benefit under the plan.
(e) A health insurance plan shall ensure access to medically necessary
clinical care and to prosthetic and orthotic devices and technology from not
fewer than two distinct prosthetic and orthotic providers who are located in this
State and are in the plan’s network. In the event that medically necessary
covered prosthetic and orthotic devices are not available from an in-network
provider in this State, the plan shall provide processes for referring a covered
individual to an out-of-network provider and shall fully reimburse the out-of-
network provider at a mutually agreed-upon rate, less the covered individual’s
cost sharing as determined on an in-network basis.
(d)(f)(1) A health insurance plan shall provide coverage under this section
for the medically necessary repair or replacement of a prosthetic or orthotic
device or for the replacement of any part of the device, without regard to
continuous use or useful lifetime restrictions, if the covered individual’s
treating health care provider determines that the provision of a replacement
device or replacement part is necessary because of any of the following:
(A) a change in the covered individual’s physiological condition;
VT LEG #380733 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.432
2025 Page 6 of 7
(B) an irreparable change in the condition of the device or a part of
the device; or
(C) the condition of the device or part of the device requires repairs,
and the cost of the repairs would equal more than 60 percent of the cost of a
replacement device or of the part being replaced.
(2) A health insurance plan may require confirmation from the covered
individual’s treating health care provider if the prosthetic or orthotic device or
part being replaced is less than three years old.
(e)(g) A health insurance plan shall not impose any annual or lifetime
dollar maximum on coverage for prosthetics prosthetic and orthotic devices
that is less than the annual or lifetime dollar maximum that applies generally to
all terms and services covered under the plan.
(f)(h) The coverage required may shall not be subject to a deductible, co-
payment, or coinsurance provision that is less favorable to a covered individual
than the deductible, co-payment, or coinsurance provisions that apply generally
to other non-primary care items and services under the health plan.
Sec. 2. PROSTHETIC AND ORTHOTIC DEVICES; HEALTH
INSURANCE CLAIMS; REPORT
(a) On or before July 1, 2029, each health insurer that is subject to the
annual reporting requirements of 18 V.S.A. § 9414a shall also report to the
VT LEG #380733 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.432
2025 Page 7 of 7
Department of Financial Regulation regarding the health insurer’s experience
with providing coverage for prosthetic and orthotic devices pursuant to
8 V.S.A. § 4088f, as amended by Sec. 1 of this act, for plan years 2026, 2027,
and 2028. The report shall be in the form required by the Commissioner of
Financial Regulation and shall include the number of claims for the goods and
services required by 8 V.S.A. § 4088f in each of the plan years and the total
amount of claims paid in this State for those goods and services in each of the
plan years.
(b) On or before December 1, 2029, the Commissioner shall provide a
report with aggregated data for all health insurers by plan year to the House
Committees on Health Care and on Human Services and the Senate
Committees on Health and Welfare and on Finance.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
(a) Sec. 1 (8 V.S.A. § 4088f) shall take effect on January 1, 2026 and shall
apply to all health insurance plans issued on and after January 1, 2026 on such
date as a health insurer offers, issues, or renews the health insurance plan, but
in no event later than January 1, 2027.
(b) The remaining sections shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380733 v.1